Illinois, session 104th, SB1909.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-5-140 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/25-5-140 new)7    Sec. 25-5-140. Quick-take; Kane County Division of 8Transportation. Quick-take proceedings under Article 20 may be 9used for a period of 12 months after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly by the Kane 11County Division of Transportation for the acquisition of the 12following described property for the purpose of intersection 13realignment and separation improvement.14    That part of Lot 2 in Winterland Subdivision, being a 15    subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 33, 16    Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal 17    Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded May 11, 18    2001 as document no. 2001K044295 in Kane County, Illinois, 19    bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 20    Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 Adjustment), 21    with a combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, being 22    described as follows: 23    Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot 2; thence   SB1909 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    northerly along the west line of said Lot 2, being a 2    43,070.80 radius curve, concave westerly an arc distance 3    of 25.38 (the chord bears North 01 degree 19 minutes 07 4    seconds West, 25.38 feet), said west line also being the 5    east right-of-way line of Randall Road (A.K.A. County 6    Highway 34); thence North 01 degree 29 minutes 37 seconds 7    West, 217.77 feet (218.00 feet record) along said west 8    line of Lot 2 to a point on a 34,332.50 foot radius curve, 9    concave easterly; thence northerly along said curve and 10    west line 62.19 feet (62.12 feet record) the chord bears 11    North 01 degree 27 minutes 22 seconds West, 62.19 feet 12    (62.12 feet record) to the northwest corner of said Lot 2; 13    thence South 89 degrees 59 minutes 23 seconds East, 11.00 14    feet along the north line of said Lot 2 to a point on line 15    11.00 east of and parallel with said west line of Lot 2, 16    being a 34,321.50 foot radius curve, concave easterly; 17    thence southerly along said curve 61.90 feet (the chord 18    bears South 01 degree 27 minutes 23 seconds East, 61.90 19    feet) along said parallel line; thence South 01 degree 29 20    minutes 37 seconds East, 217.78 feet along said parallel 21    line to a point on a 43,081.80 foot radius curve, concave 22    westerly; thence southerly along said curve 25.39 feet 23    (the chord bears South 01 degree 19 minutes 07 seconds 24    East, 25.39 feet) along said parallel line to a point on 25    the south line of said Lot 2; thence South 88 degrees 39 26    minutes 23 seconds West, 11.00 feet along said south line   SB1909 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    to the point of beginning. 2    Said parcel containing 0.077 acres, more or less.  3    That part of Lot 4 in Winterland Subdivision, being a 4    subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 33, 5    Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal 6    Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded May 11, 7    2001 as document no. 2001K044295 in Kane County, Illinois, 8    bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 9    Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 Adjustment), 10    with a combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, being 11    described as follows: 12    Beginning at the northwest corner of said Lot 4; thence 13    North 88 degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds East, 40.00 feet 14    along the north line of said Lot 4; thence South 32 degrees 15    46 minutes 19 seconds West, 52.02 feet to a point on a line 16    11.00 feet east of and parallel with said west line of Lot 17    4, being a 34,321.50 foot radius curve, concave easterly; 18    thence southerly along said curve 157.00 feet (the chord 19    bears South 01 degree 16 minutes 25 seconds East, 157.00 20    feet) to a point on the south line of said Lot 4; thence 21    North 89 degrees 59 minutes 23 seconds West, 11.00 feet 22    along said south line to the southwest corner of said Lot 23    4; thence northerly along said west line of Lot 4, said 24    west line also being the east right-of-way line of Randall 25    Road (A.K.A. County Highway 34) and being a 34,332.50 foot   SB1909 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    radius curve, concave easterly an arc distance of 199.97 2    feet (the chord bears North 01 degree 14 minutes 14 3    seconds West, 199.97 feet) to the point of beginning.4    Said parcel containing 0.065 acres, more or less.  5    That part of Lot 4 in Winterland Subdivision, being a 6    subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 33, 7    Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal 8    Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded May 11, 9    2001 as document no. 2001K044295 in Kane County, Illinois, 10    bearings and distances based on the Illinois State Plane 11    Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 Adjustment), 12    with a combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, being 13    described as follows:14    Commencing at the northeast corner of said Lot 4; thence 15    South 88 degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds West, 122.00 feet 16    along the north line of said Lot 4 to the point of 17    beginning; thence South 01 degree 07 minutes 16 seconds 18    East, 5.00 feet to a point on a line 5.00 feet south of and 19    parallel with the said north line of Lot 4; thence South 88 20    degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds West, 41.00 feet along said 21    parallel line; thence North 01 degree 07 minutes 16 22    seconds West, 5.00 feet to a point on said north line of 23    Lot 4; thence North 88 degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds East, 24    41.00 feet along said north line to the point of 25    beginning.  SB1909 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    Said temporary easement containing 0.005 acres or 205 2    square feet, more or less.  3    That part of Lot 2 in Panko's Subdivision, being a 4    subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 33, 5    Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal 6    Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded November 7    6, 2003 as document no. 2003K195732 in Kane County, 8    Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 9    State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 10    Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, 11    being described as follows:12    Commencing at the southeast corner of said Lot 2; thence 13    South 88 degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds West, 142.50 feet 14    along the south line of said Lot 2 to the point of 15    beginning; thence continuing South 88 degrees 52 minutes 16    44 seconds West, 134.05 feet along said south line; thence 17    North 01 degree 02 minutes 08 seconds East, 5.00 feet 18    along said south line; thence North 80 degrees 02 minutes 19    54 seconds West, 20.84 feet along said south line; thence 20    North 88 degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds East, 154.32 feet; 21    thence South 01 degree 07 minutes 16 seconds East, 9.00 22    feet to the point of beginning.23    Said parcel containing 0.029 acres, more or less.  24    That part of Lot 2 in Panko's Subdivision, being a   SB1909 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    subdivision in the Southwest Quarter of Section 33, 2    Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal 3    Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded November 4    6, 2003 as document no. 2003K195732 in Kane County, 5    Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 6    State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 7    Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, 8    being described as follows:9    Commencing at the southeast corner of said Lot 2; thence 10    South 88 degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds West, 142.50 feet 11    along the south line of said Lot 2; thence North 01 degree 12    07 minutes 16 seconds West, 9.00 feet to the point of 13    beginning; thence South 88 degrees 52 minutes 44 seconds 14    West, 154.32 feet to a point on the south line of said Lot 15    2; thence North 80 degrees 02 minutes 54 seconds West, 16    28.64 feet along said south line; thence North 88 degrees 17    52 minutes 44 seconds East, 59.85 feet; thence North 04 18    degrees 00 minutes 18 seconds West, 5.00 feet; thence 19    South 88 degrees 05 minutes 42 seconds East, 123.00 feet; 20    thence South 01 degree 07 minutes 16 seconds East, 4.00 21    feet to the point of beginning.22    Said temporary easement containing 0.026 acres, more or 23    less.  24    That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 32, Township 25    41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal Meridian in   SB1909 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    Kane County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the 2    Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 3    (2011 Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 4    0.9999369004, being described as follows:5    Commencing at the northeast corner of said Southeast 6    Quarter of Section 32; thence South 00 degrees 00 minutes 7    17 seconds East, 766.95 feet along the east line of said 8    Southeast Quarter of Section 32 to a point on the 9    southerly line of the 200.00 foot right-of-way of the 10    Canadian National Railroad (A.K.A. The Illinois Central 11    Gulf Railroad and The Chicago Central and Pacific 12    Railroad), said point being the point of beginning; thence 13    North 56 degrees 57 minutes 22 seconds West, 109.47 feet 14    along said southerly line to a point on a line 63.00 feet 15    west of and parallel with the centerline of right-of-way 16    as platted and described by document no. 780936, recorded 17    May 27, 1955; thence North 00 degrees 05 minutes 18 18    seconds West, 107.47 feet along said parallel line to a 19    point on a line 90.00 feet north of and parallel with said 20    southerly line of the 200.00 foot right-of-way of the 21    Canadian National Railroad; thence South 56 degrees 57 22    minutes 22 seconds East, 109.66 feet along said parallel 23    line to a point on said east line of said Southeast Quarter 24    of Section 32; thence South 00 degrees 00 minutes 17 25    seconds East, 107.37 feet along said east line to the 26    point of beginning.  SB1909 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    Said parcel containing 0.226 acres, more or less.  2    That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 32, Township 3    41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal Meridian in 4    Kane County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the 5    Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 6    (2011 Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 7    0.9999369004, being described as follows:8    Commencing at the northeast corner of said Southeast 9    Quarter of Section 32; thence South 00 degrees 00 minutes 10    17 seconds East, 528.35 feet along the east line of said 11    Southeast Quarter of Section 32 to a point on the 12    northerly line of the 200.00 foot right-of-way of the 13    Canadian National Railroad (A.K.A. The Illinois Central 14    Gulf Railroad and The Chicago Central and Pacific 15    Railroad), said point being the point of beginning; thence 16    continuing South 00 degrees 00 minutes 17 seconds East, 17    35.79 feet along said east line to a point on a line 30.00 18    feet south of and parallel with said northerly line of the 19    200.00 foot right-of-way of the Canadian National 20    Railroad; thence North 56 degrees 57 minutes 22 seconds 21    West, 109.83 feet along said parallel line to a point on a 22    line 63.00 feet west of and parallel with the centerline 23    of right-of-way as platted and described by document no. 24    780936, recorded May 27, 1955; thence North 00 degrees 05 25    minutes 18 seconds West, 35.82 feet along said parallel   SB1909 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    line to a point on said northerly line of the 200.00 foot 2    right-of-way of the Canadian National Railroad; thence 3    South 56 degrees 57 minutes 22 seconds East, 109.89 feet 4    along said northerly line to the point of beginning.5    Said parcel containing 0.076 acres, more or less.  6    That part of the Southeast Quarter of Section 32, Township 7    41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal Meridian in 8    Kane County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the 9    Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 10    (2011 Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 11    0.9999369004, being described as follows:12    Commencing at the northeast corner of said Southeast 13    Quarter of Section 32; thence South 00 degrees 00 minutes 14    17 seconds East, 528.35 feet along the east line of said 15    Southeast Quarter of Section 32 to a point on the 16    northerly line of the 200.00 foot right-of-way of the 17    Canadian National Railroad (A.K.A. The Illinois Central 18    Gulf Railroad and The Chicago Central and Pacific 19    Railroad); thence North 56 degrees 57 minutes 22 seconds 20    West, 82.42 feet along said northerly line to a point on 21    the west right-of-way line of Randall Road (A.K.A. County 22    Highway 34) as dedicated by document no. 780936, recorded 23    May 27, 1955, said point being the point of beginning; 24    thence North 56 degrees 57 minutes 22 seconds West, 27.47 25    feet along said northerly line to a point on a line 23.00   SB1909 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    feet west of and parallel with said west right-of-way line 2    of Randall Road; thence North 00 degrees 05 minutes 18 3    seconds West, 137.33 feet along said parallel line to a 4    point on a line 115.00 feet northerly of and parallel with 5    said northerly line of the 200.00 foot right-of-way of the 6    Canadian National Railroad; thence South 56 degrees 57 7    minutes 22 seconds East, 27.47 feet along said parallel 8    line to a point on said west right-of-way line of Randall 9    Road; thence South 00 degrees 05 minutes 18 seconds East, 10    137.33 feet along said west right-of-way line to the point 11    of beginning.12    Said permanent easement containing 0.073 acres, more or 13    less.  14    That part of the Southeast Quarter and Northeast Quarter 15    of Section 32, Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third 16    Principal Meridian in Kane County, Illinois, bearings and 17    distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 18    System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 Adjustment), with a 19    combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, being described as 20    follows:21    Commencing at the southeast corner of said Northeast 22    Quarter of Section 32; thence North 00 degrees 19 minutes 23    41 seconds East, 29.61 feet along the east line of said 24    Southeast Quarter of Section 32 to a point on the north 25    line of the south 29.60 feet of said Northeast Quarter of   SB1909 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    Section 32; thence South 88 degrees 45 minutes 58 seconds 2    West, 59.02 feet along said north line of the south 29.60 3    feet of the Northeast Quarter to a point on the original 4    west right-of-way line of Randall Road (A.K.A. County 5    Highway 34), said point being the point of beginning; 6    thence South 00 degrees 05 minutes 18 seconds East, 119.14 7    feet along said original west right-of-way line of Randall 8    Road to a point on the west right-of-way line of Randall 9    Road as dedicated by document no. 780936 recorded May 27, 10    1955, said west right-of-way line being a 1,677.28 foot 11    radius curve, concave easterly; thence southerly along 12    said curve and west right-of-way line 192.20 feet (the 13    chord bears South 03 degrees 11 minutes 40 seconds West, 14    192.09 feet); thence South 00 degrees 05 minutes 18 15    seconds East, 63.48 feet along said west right-of-way line 16    to a point on a line 115.00 feet northerly of and parallel 17    with said northerly line of the 200.00 foot right-of-way 18    of the Canadian National Railroad (A.K.A. The Illinois 19    Central Gulf Railroad and The Chicago Central and Pacific 20    Railroad); thence North 56 degrees 57 minutes 22 seconds 21    West, 27.47 feet along said parallel line to a point on a 22    line 63.00 feet west of and parallel with the centerline 23    of right-of-way as platted and described by said document 24    no. 780936; thence North 00 degrees 05 minutes 18 seconds 25    West, 48.46 feet along said parallel line to a point on a 26    1,700.28 foot radius curve, concave easterly; thence   SB1909 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    northerly along said curve and parallel line 264.27 feet 2    (the chord bears North 04 degrees 21 minutes 51 seconds 3    East, 264.00 feet); thence North 81 degrees 11 minutes 00 4    seconds West, 36.00 feet to a point on a line 99.00 feet 5    west of and parallel with the centerline of right-of-way 6    as platted and described by said document no. 780936, 7    being a 1,736.28 foot radius curve, concave easterly; 8    thence northerly along said curve and parallel line 41.88 9    feet (the chord bears North 09 degrees 30 minutes 29 10    seconds East, 41.88 feet) to a point on said north line of 11    the south 29.60 feet of said Northeast Quarter of Section 12    32; thence North 88 degrees 45 minutes 34 seconds East, 13    42.10 feet along said north line to the point of 14    beginning.15    Said parcel containing 0.209 acres, more or less.  16    That part of the Southeast Quarter and Northeast Quarter 17    of Section 32, Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third 18    Principal Meridian in Kane County, Illinois, bearings and 19    distances based on the Illinois State Plane Coordinate 20    System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 Adjustment), with a 21    combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, being described as 22    follows:23    Commencing at the southeast corner of said Northeast 24    Quarter of Section 32; thence North 00 degrees 19 minutes 25    41 seconds East, 29.61 feet along the east line of said   SB1909 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    Southeast Quarter of Section 32 to a point on the north 2    line of the south 29.60 feet of said Northeast Quarter of 3    Section 32; thence South 88 degrees 45 minutes 34 seconds 4    West, 101.12 feet along said north line of the south 29.60 5    feet of the Northeast Quarter to a point on a line 99.00 6    feet west of and parallel with the centerline of 7    right-of-way as platted and described by document no. 8    780936 recorded May 27, 1955, being a 1,736.28 foot radius 9    curve, concave easterly, said point being the point of 10    beginning; thence southerly along said curve and parallel 11    line 41.88 feet (the chord bears South 09 degrees 30 12    minutes 29 seconds West, 41.88 feet); thence South 81 13    degrees 11 minutes 00 seconds East, 36.00 feet to a point 14    on a line 63.00 feet west of and parallel with said 15    centerline of right-of-way platted and described by said 16    document no. 780936, said parallel line being a 1,700.28 17    foot radius curve, concave easterly; thence southerly 18    along said curve and parallel line 6.00 feet (the chord 19    bears South 08 degrees 42 minutes 57 seconds West, 6.00 20    feet); thence North 81 degrees 11 minutes 00 seconds West, 21    46.00 feet to a point on a line 109.00 feet west of and 22    parallel with said centerline of right-of-way, being a 23    1,746.28 foot radius curve, concave easterly; thence 24    northerly along said curve and parallel line 46.10 feet 25    (the chord bears North 09 degrees 22 minutes 35 seconds 26    East, 46.10 feet) to a point on said north line of the   SB1909 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    south 29.60 feet of said Northeast Quarter of Section 32; 2    thence North 88 degrees 45 minutes 34 seconds East, 10.20 3    feet along said north line to the point of beginning.4    Said temporary easement containing 0.016 acres, more or 5    less.  6    That part of Lot "A" in Fox Ridge Townhomes Subdivision, 7    being a subdivision in the Northwest Quarter of Section 8    33, Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal 9    Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded October 10    19, 1998 as document no. 98K096197 in Kane County, 11    Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 12    State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 13    Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, 14    being described as follows:15    Beginning at the southwest corner of said Lot "A"; thence 16    northerly along the westerly line of said Lot "A", said 17    westerly line also being the easterly right-of-way line of 18    Randall Road (A.K.A. County Highway 34) and being a 19    1,870.08 foot radius curve, concave southwesterly an arc 20    distance of 819.75 feet (820.44 feet and 820.45 feet 21    record) the chord bears North 21 degrees 52 minutes 55 22    seconds East, 813.20 feet to a point on a 1,597.28 foot 23    radius curve (1,597.28 feet and 1,590.54 feet record), 24    concave southwesterly; thence northerly along said curve 25    and westerly line 175.78 feet (175.96 feet and 172.58 feet   SB1909 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    record) the chord bears North 43 degrees 36 minutes 14 2    seconds East, 175.69 feet; thence North 46 degrees 45 3    minutes 24 seconds East, 95.81 feet (94.10 feet and 94.65 4    feet record) to the northeast corner of said Lot "A"; 5    thence South 00 degrees 22 minutes 14 seconds West, 13.78 6    feet along the east line of said Lot "A"; thence South 40 7    degrees 45 minutes 53 seconds West, 231.44 feet (13.78 8    feet record) to a point on a 1,754.00 foot radius curve, 9    concave southwesterly; thence southerly along said curve 10    621.57 feet (the chord bears south 27 degrees 13 minutes 11    55 seconds West, 618.32 feet); thence South 74 degrees 00 12    minutes 44 seconds East, 12.25 feet to a point on a 13    1,845.08 foot radius curve, concave westerly; thence 14    southerly along said curve 210.00 feet (the chord bears 15    south 12 degrees 43 minutes 38 seconds West, 209.89 feet) 16    to a point on the south line of said Lot "A"; thence South 17    88 degrees 55 minutes 06 seconds West, 25.42 feet along 18    said south line to the point of beginning.19    Said parcel containing 0.531 acres, more or less.  20    That part of the Northwest Quarter of Section 33, Township 21    41 North, Range 8 East of the Third Principal Meridian in 22    Kane County, Illinois, bearings and distances based on the 23    Illinois State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 24    (2011 Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 25    0.9999369004, being described as follows:  SB1909 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    Beginning at a point of intersection with the north line 2    of said Northwest Quarter of Section 33 and the west 3    right-of-way line of Randall Road (A.K.A. County Highway 4    34) as acquired by the County of Kane by deed document no. 5    1157361, recorded January 29, 1970; thence South 01 degree 6    01 minutes 35 seconds East, 21.85 feet (22.87 feet record) 7    along said west right-of-way line to a point on a 1,864.08 8    foot radius curve, concave westerly; thence southerly 9    along said curve and west right-of-way line 1,487.19 feet 10    (the chord bears South 21 degrees 36 minutes 50 seconds 11    West, 1,448.06 feet); thence South 44 degrees 49 minutes 12    39 seconds West, 121.14 feet along said west right-of-way 13    line to a point on the centerline of the 50.00 foot 14    rightof- way of Hopps Road as monumented and occupied; 15    thence South 89 degrees 05 minutes 22 seconds West, 673.34 16    feet along said centerline of right-of-way; thence North 17    00 degrees 54 minutes 38 seconds West, 52.00 feet to a 18    point on a line 52.00 feet north of and parallel with said 19    centerline of right-of-way; thence North 89 degrees 05 20    minutes 22 seconds East, 110.00 feet along said parallel 21    line; thence North 64 degrees 13 minutes 06 seconds East, 22    209.69 feet to a point on a 545.00 foot radius curve, 23    concave southerly; thence easterly along said curve 413.09 24    feet (the chord bears North 85 degrees 55 minutes 58 25    seconds East, 403.28 feet); thence North 37 degrees 23 26    minutes 02 seconds East, 312.52 feet to a point on a   SB1909 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    1,674.00 foot radius curve, concave westerly; thence 2    northerly along said curve 1,117.16 feet (the chord bears 3    North 18 degrees 15 minutes 56 seconds East, 1,096.54 4    feet); thence North 88 degrees 28 minutes 42 seconds East, 5    58.01 feet along to the point of beginning.6    Said parcel containing 5.068 acres, more or less, of which 7    0.394 acres, more or less, was previously dedicated or 8    used for highway purposes.  9    That part of Lot 160 in Woodbridge South - Phase 1 10    Subdivision, being a subdivision in the Northwest Quarter 11    of Section 33, Township 41 North, Range 8 East of the Third 12    Principal Meridian, according to the plat thereof recorded 13    December 5, 1991 as document no. 91K066828 in Kane County, 14    Illinois, bearings and distances based on the Illinois 15    State Plane Coordinate System, East Zone, NAD 83 (2011 16    Adjustment), with a combined scale factor of 0.9999369004, 17    being described as follows:18    Beginning at the northwesterly corner of said Lot 160; 19    thence North 88 degrees 15 minutes 13 seconds East, 21.00 20    feet along the north line of said Lot 160, said north line 21    also being the south right-of-way line of Hopps Road; 22    thence South 62 degrees 41 minutes 34 seconds West, 50.68 23    feet to a point on the westerly line of said Lot 160, said 24    westerly line also being the easterly right-of-way line of 25    Randall Road (A.K.A. County Highway 34); thence North 46   SB1909 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 09445 JRC 19505 b1    degrees 45 minutes 24 seconds East, 33.00 feet along said 2    westerly line to the point of beginning.3    Said temporary easement containing 0.005 acres or 230 4    square feet, more or less. 5    (b) This Section is repealed 2 years after the effective 6date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.